Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Regular Elections
118.415.
Constitutional amendments.

The General Assembly may state the substance of the amendment proposed to the Constitution of Kentucky in the form of a question in a manner calculated to inform the electorate of the substance of the amendment. When an amendment to the Constitution has been proposed by the General Assembly, the Secretary of State shall cause the question calculated to inform the electorate of the substance of the amendment which is prepared by the General Assembly or the Attorney General to be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be voted for. The publication shall be made not later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to be voted on.

The Attorney General shall, if the General Assembly has not already done so, state the substance of an amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky which has been proposed by the General Assembly in the form of a question in a manner calculated to inform the electorate of the substance of the amendment, and, not later than fourteen (14) days preceding the first Tuesday in August preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen, shall certify the question to the Secretary of State to be placed on the ballots.

The Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United States, shall certify the substance of the amendment, as stated and certified by the General Assembly or by the Attorney General, to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have the substance of the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots.

The votes cast for and against the amendment shall be counted, canvassed, and certified to the Secretary of State in the same manner as the votes cast for any officer elective by the votes of the whole state. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are for the amendment, it shall become a part of the Constitution.

The expenses of the publications provided for in this section shall be paid as are the expenses of other publications that the Secretary of State is required to make in connection with elections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 127; 1978, ch. 318, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 23, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 296, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 461, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 195, § 18, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 2, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 197, § 56, effective June 29, 2021.

118.420.
State
board to issue certificates of election for state and district offices —
Tie votes. [Repealed.]

118.425.
Issuance of certificates of election — Tie votes.

The State Board of Elections shall issue certificates of election where the successful candidate was voted for by the state at large, was voted for by a district greater than one (1) county, or was a candidate for member of Congress or the General Assembly.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, not later than the second Monday after the election, the county board of elections shall issue certificates of election where the successful candidate was voted for by the electors of one (1) county, or of a district less than one (1) county, except members of Congress, members of the General Assembly, and designated officers filing with the Secretary of State. The right to contest or recount an election in accordance with KRS Chapter 120 shall not be impaired. The county board of elections of the candidate’s residence shall issue certificates of election where the successful candidate was voted for by the electors of a city or school district whose boundaries extend beyond those of a single county. The board shall forward the certificate to the elected candidate. If the board finds that two (2) or more candidates have received the highest and equal number of votes for the same office, the board shall determine by lot which of the candidates is elected.

In counties containing cities of the first class, not later than the thirtieth day of December after the election, the county board of elections shall issue certificates of election where the successful candidate was voted for by the electors of the county, except members of Congress, members of the General Assembly, and designated officers filing with the Secretary of State. The right to contest or recount an election in accordance with KRS Chapter 120 shall not be impaired. The county board of elections of the candidate’s residence shall issue certificates of election where the successful candidate was voted for by the electors of a city whose boundaries extend beyond those of a single county. The board shall forward the certificate to the elected candidate. If the board finds that two (2) or more candidates have received the highest and equal number of votes for the same office, the board shall determine by lot which of the candidates is elected.

In the case of all offices voted for, and in the case of public questions submitted to the vote of the people of the state at large or of a district greater than one (1) county, the county board of elections shall make out duplicate certificates of the total number of votes received by each of the candidates for the office and the total number of votes for and against each of the questions on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The certificate of the total number of votes shall be certified to the Secretary of State’s Office not later than 12 p.m., prevailing time, on the Friday following the election. For special elections the certificate of the total number of votes shall be certified to the Secretary of State’s Office not later than 12 p.m., prevailing time, on the day following the election. The clerk shall keep one (1) of the certificates in his or her office. He or she shall not later than three (3) days after receiving the certificate from the board, forward the other certificate by mail to the Secretary of State who shall deliver it to the State Board of Elections.

The State Board of Elections shall meet, to count and tabulate the votes received by the different candidates as certified to the Secretary of State no later than the third Monday after the election. The right to contest or recount an election in accordance with KRS Chapter 120 shall not be impaired. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and may act. The board shall make out the certificates of election in the office of the board from the returns made. The board shall make out duplicate certificates of election, in writing, over the signatures of its members. The board shall forward the original certificate, by mail, to the elected candidate. The duplicate shall be retained in the office of the board. In the case of the election of a representative in Congress, an additional certificate shall be made and sent, by mail, to the clerk of the House of Representatives.

The certificate of election shall be issued to the candidate receiving the highest number of votes in the territory from which the election is to be made. If two (2) or more persons are found to have received the highest and an equal number of votes for the same office, the election shall be determined by lot in the manner the board directs, in the presence of not less than three (3) other persons. In the case of elections for electors of President and Vice President of the United States, the board shall issue a certificate of election to each elector of the political party or organization whose candidates for President and Vice President received the highest number of votes and the determination by the board that the candidates of any political party or organization for President and Vice President have received the highest number of votes shall constitute a determination that the electors nominated by that party have been elected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 128; 1978, ch. 318, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 24, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 31, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 169, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 77, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 79, § 8, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 12, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 62, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

118.430.
Constitutional
amendments — How submitted to vote and voted on. [Repealed.]

118.435.
Time
of election of presidential electors.

The election of electors of
President and Vice President of the United States shall be held on the Tuesday
next after the first Monday in November every four (4) years, beginning with
1892. The Governor may, by proclamation, appoint the same day in any other
year, pursuant to Act of Congress, for holding the election, in the event
of a vacancy in the offices of President and Vice President.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 129.

118.440.
Challengers
and inspectors for election on constitutional amendment. [Repealed.]

118.445.
Meeting
of presidential electors — Filling vacancy if elector fails to attend.

The electors of President and
Vice President of the United States shall convene at the State Capitol, at
11:45 a.m. on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December next
after their election, give their votes at or after 12 noon, and make return
thereof according to law. If any elector fails to attend by 12 noon, on the
day of the meeting, those in attendance shall fill his place by the election
of another person, who shall have the same powers as if originally elected
by the people.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 130; 1986, ch. 470, § 32, effective July 15, 1986.

118.450.
Cost
of elections — Payment — Voting machines, acquisition. [Repealed.]

118.455.
Compensation
of presidential electors.

Each elector of President and
Vice President of the United States, for each day he attends at the State
Capitol as an elector, shall receive the same per diem and mileage as may
at the time be allowed to members of the General Assembly, to be paid out
of the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 131.

118.465.
Election of United States Senators.

One (1) United States Senator shall be elected at the regular November election every six (6) years beginning with 1914, and one (1) shall be elected at the regular November election every six (6) years beginning with 1918, to succeed the Senator whose term will expire the succeeding year. The election for United States Senator shall be held and the result shall be ascertained and certified in the same manner as the elections for state officers. After the returns have been canvassed, the Governor shall certify the election of the person elected to the President of the Senate of the United States. The certificate shall be under the seal of the state and shall be countersigned by the Secretary of State. All electors who are eligible to vote for representatives in Congress shall be eligible to vote for United States Senator, and the person receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 132.

118.475.
Time
of election of representatives in Congress.

The election of representatives
in Congress shall be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November
in every even numbered year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 133.

118.485.
Congressional
districts. [Repealed.]

118.495.
Construction
of KRS 118.485. [Repealed.]